NO.6 CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]
id0103b3801200
6 |
CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START |
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DESCRIPTION
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• The starter cranks the engine at normal speed but the engine will not run.
• Refer to symptom troubleshooting “No.5 Engine stalls” if this symptom appears after engine stall.
• Fuel is in the fuel tank.
• Battery is normal.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Poor fuel quality
• Intake-air system restriction
• Fuel line restriction
• EGR system malfunction
• Glow system malfunction
• Fuel pressure sensor or related circuit malfunction
• Fuel metering valve malfunction
• Fuel pressure limiter malfunction
• Fuel leakage
• Fuel filter clogging
• Incorrect fuel injection timing
• Fuel warmer system malfunction
• Erratic signal from CKP sensor
• Erratic signal from CMP sensor
• V-reference supply circuit malfunction
• ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
• Supply pump malfunction
• Fuel injector malfunction
• Immobilizer system and/or circuit malfunction (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
• Immobilizer system operating properly. (Engine key is not programmed.) (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
• Low engine compression
• Improper valve timing
• PCM control repay malfunction
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Diagnostic Procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
RESULTS |
ACTION |
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1
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
• Engine does not crank.
• DTC P1260 is displayed.
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Yes
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Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 4.
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No
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Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
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2
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Is the coil connector securely connected to the coil?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Connect the coil connector securely.
Return to Step 1.
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3
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Does the security light illuminate?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect the instrument cluster and wiring harness.
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4
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve the DTCs.
DTC
B1213, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2139, B2141, B2431,U2510
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Yes
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Go to the appropriate DTC test.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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5
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Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
• Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
• Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
• Between PCM terminal 309 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
• Between PCM terminal 301 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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Inspect the following:
• Fuel quality (e.g.: include water contamination, winter/summer blend)
• Fuel line/fuel filter clogging
• Intake-air system restriction
Are all items normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 7.
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8
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Disconnect the accelerator pedal position sensor connector.
Measure the voltage at the accelerator pedal position sensor connector VREF terminal (terminal 1) with the engine switch ON.
Specification
4.5—5.5 V
Is the voltage normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect and repair or replace the following:
• Instrument cluster
• Wiring harness or connectors between accelerator pedal position sensor terminal 1 and instrument cluster terminal 2X
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9
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTC.
Are DTCs displayed?
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Yes
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DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect for the following:
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 236 or 231
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 241
• PCM control relay stuck open
• Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 307, 308 or 332)
• Poorly connected vehicle body ground
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No
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No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
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10
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Inspect glow system operation.
Is the glow system operation normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the glow system operation results.
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11
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Inspect fuel warmer system operation. Is the fuel warmer system operation normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the fuel warmer system operation inspection results.
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12
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Inspect for fuel leakage from the fuel pipe.
Is any fuel leakage found on the fuel pipe?
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Yes
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Repair or replace if necessary.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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13
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Visually inspect CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Are the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace malfunctioning parts.
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14
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Measure gap between CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Specification
1.5—2.5 mm {0.059—0.098 in}
Is the gap within the specification?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Adjust the CKP sensor position.
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15
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Visually inspect CMP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Are the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
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Yes
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Inspect the following PIDs:
• ECT
• RPM
If the PID value is not as specified, repair or replace malfunctioning parts.
If the PID value is normal, go to the next step.
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No
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Replace malfunctioning parts.
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16
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Inspect fuel pressure sensor.
Is the fuel pressure normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace the common rail.
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17
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Inspect the fuel metering valve.
Is the fuel metering valve normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace the fuel pump.
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18
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Is the engine compression correct?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect for the following:
• Damaged valve seat
• Worn valve stem and valve guide
• Worn or stuck piston ring
• Worn piston, piston ring or cylinder
• Improper valve timing
Service if necessary.
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19
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Inspect fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace if necessary.
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20
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Inspect EGR system operation.
Is the EGR system operation normal?
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Yes
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Remove and inspect the supply pump and common rail.
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No
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Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the EGR system operation results.
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21
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Verify test results.
• If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms. (See SYMPTOM DIAGNOSTIC INDEX [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
• If the malfunction remains, inspect related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
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